dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="k/ie__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eik</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikar</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikast</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ika</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ika</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ika</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ika</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iker</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ike</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ike</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ike</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iki</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikte</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ikt</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ik</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ik</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v/inne__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innar</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innast</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inna</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>inna</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inna</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inna</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inne</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inne</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unni</l>
          <r>inne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/eggas__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agdes</l>
          <r>eggas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ags</l>
          <r>eggas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eggas</l>
          <r>eggas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egs</l>
          <r>eggas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/yve__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>auv</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yvast</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yva</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yvde</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yvd</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yver</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yve</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yvt</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yv</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yv</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sl/økke__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økkast</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>økka</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økker</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økke</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okke</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okki</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økk</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økk</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>okk</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økte</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>økt</l>
          <r>økke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/oras__vblex">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>orast</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ordest</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orest</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orst</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørst</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oras</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ordes</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ores</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ors</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørs</l>
          <r>oras<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="parallellskyve"><i>parallellsk</i><par n="sk/yve__vblex_adj"/></e>
